Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-224
Condemnation proceedings; procedure.

All condemnations of educational lands shall be exercised in the manner set forth in section 72-224.03; Provided, condemnation proceedings may be brought by the United States of America in the district court of the United States of America.

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 2, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-224;

Laws 1949, c. 213, § 1(1), p. 608;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 110, p. 499;

Laws 1967, c. 466, § 3, p. 1445.